Maryland, session 2026, HB1176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
1–101.
(a) In this article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following words have
the meanings indicated.
– 1 –

Ch. 580 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) “County board” means the board of education of a county and includes the
Baltimore City Board of School Commissioners.
5–103.
(a) The amount requested in the annual budget of each county board for current
expenses for the next school year and that is to be raised by revenue from local sources may
not be less than the minimum amount required to be levied under § 5–202(d)(1)(i) of this
title.
(b) The county commissioners or county council may provide funds that are more
than the amount required by § 5–202(d)(1)(i) of this title to support improved and additional
programs.
(c) If a county council or board of county commissioners does not approve the
amount requested in the budget that is more than the amount required by § 5–202(d)(1)(i)
of this title:
(1) The county council or board of county commissioners:
(i) May not reduce the amount requested in the budget that is
dedicated to satisfying a final court judgment; and
(ii) Shall indicate in writing, within 15 days after the adoption of the
budget, which major categories of the annual budget have been reduced and the reason for
the reduction; and
(2) The county board shall submit to the county governing body, within 30
days after the adoption of the budget, a report indicating how the alterations to the budget
will be implemented, accompanied by reasonable supporting detail and analysis.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE OF HOWARD COUNTY MAY NOT SUBMIT AND THE HOWARD
COUNTY COUNCIL MAY NOT APPROVE AN ANNUAL BUDGET THAT APPROPRIATES
FUNDING TO THE HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION IN AN AMOUNT THAT IS
LESS THAN 58% OF THE GENERAL FUND REVENUE OF THE COUNTY FOR THE FISCAL
YEAR.
(2) IF THE HOWARD COUNTY BOARD REQUESTS AN AMOUNT IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET THAT IS LESS THAN 58% OF THE GENERAL FUND REVENUE OF THE
COUNTY FOR THE FISCAL YEAR, THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE OF HOWARD COUNTY
SHALL SUBMIT AND THE HOWARD COUNTY COUNCIL SHALL APPROVE AN ANNUAL
BUDGET THAT APPROPRIATES FUNDING TO THE HOWARD COUNTY BOARD IN THE
AMOUNT REQUESTED.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 580
5–102.
(a) In this subtitle, “county council” means, in Baltimore City, the Mayor and City
Council of Baltimore.
(b) (1) Each county board shall submit an annual school budget in writing to
the county commissioners, county council, or county executive.
(2) The budget shall be submitted not less than 45 days before the date for
levying local taxes or on an earlier date on or after March 1 as may be requested by the
county fiscal authority.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to a county that has a county governing
body that consists of a county executive and county council.
(2) (I) The county executive shall indicate in writing which major
categories of the annual budget of the county board have been denied in whole or reduced
in part and the reason for the denial or reduction.
(II) IN HOWARD COUNTY, IN ADDITION TO THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, IN THE SUBMISSION OF
THE ANNUAL BUDGET TO THE COUNTY COUNCIL, THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE SHALL
INDICATE IN WRITING THE PERCENTAGE OF THE COUNTY’S GENERAL FUND
REVENUE, EXCLUDING ONE–TIME EXPENSES, THAT IS ALLOCATED TO THE
OPERATING BUDGET OF THE BOARD OF EDUCATION AND OPERATING COSTS
ASSOCIATED WITH THE HOWARD COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM, INCLUDING:
1. PENSION OBLIGATIONS;
2. EMPLOYEE AND RETIREE BENEFITS;
3. DEBT SERVICE;
4. SCHOOL AND STUDENT SAFETY; AND
5. TRANSPORTATION.
(3) The county council may restore any denial or reduction made by the
county executive in the annual budget submitted by the county board.
(4) In Baltimore County, the County Council may not restore any denial or
reduction made by the County Executive.
(5) This paragraph applies to Baltimore County and supersedes paragraph
(4) of this subsection only if the voters of Baltimore County approve an amendment to the
– 3 –

Ch. 580 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Baltimore County Charter that grants the County Council the authority to restore any
denial or reduction made by the County Executive in the budget submitted by the county
board. The Baltimore County Council may restore any denial or reduction made by the
County Executive if it publicly states the amount the restoration represents in the county
tax rate.
(d) (1) In Baltimore City, the City Council may not restore any denial or
reduction made by the Mayor.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies to Baltimore City and supersedes
paragraph (1) of this subsection only if the voters of Baltimore City approve an amendment
to the Baltimore City Charter that grants the City Council the authority to restore any
denial or reduction made by the Mayor in the budget submitted by the county board.
(ii) The Baltimore City Council may restore any denial or reduction
made by the Mayor if it publicly states the amount the restoration represents in the city
tax rate.
(e) (1) Copies of the budget shall be made available to the public, on request,
at the time it is submitted by the county board.
(2) (I) A copy of the budget as approved by the county commissioners or
county council shall be sent to the State Superintendent within 30 days after approval and
posted on the county board’s public–facing website, in an easily identifiable location.
(II) IN HOWARD COUNTY, A COPY OF THE BUDGET AS
APPROVED BY THE COUNTY COUNCIL SHALL INCLUDE, IN WRITING, THE
PERCENTAGE OF THE COUNTY’S GENERAL FUND REVENUE, EXCLUDING ONE–TIME
EXPENSES, THAT IS APPROPRIATED TO THE OPERATING BUDGET OF THE HOWARD
COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION AND OPERATING COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
HOWARD COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM, INCLUDING:
1. PENSION OBLIGATIONS;
2. EMPLOYEE AND RETIREE BENEFITS;
3. DEBT SERVICE;
4. SCHOOL AND STUDENT SAFETY; AND
5. TRANSPORTATION.
(3) A copy of the budget submitted under subsection (b)(1) of this section
shall be placed on the county board’s public–facing website, in an easily identifiable
location.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 580
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 5 –